Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-920
Registered voter; memorandum; use permitted.

A registered voter may take with him or her into the polling place any printed or written memorandum or paper to assist him or her in preparing or marking the ballot.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 263.